North Carolina, session 2025, SB507.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-81.36 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-81.36. Advanced courses in mathematics.mathematics and English Language
Arts.
(a) When practicable, local boards of education shall offer advanced learning
opportunities in mathematics in grades three through five, and advanced courses in mathematics
in all grades six and higher. For the purposes of this section, advanced learning opportunities are
those services and curricular modifications in mathematics and English Language Arts for
academically or intellectually gifted students approved as part of the local plan, as required by
G.S. 115C-150.7.G.S. 115C-150.7, and advanced courses are advanced courses in mathematics
and English Language Arts.
(a1) When advanced learning opportunities are offered in mathematics in grades three
through five, any student scoring at the highest level on the corresponding end-of-grade test shall,
for the next school year, be provided advanced learning opportunities in mathematics approved
for that student's grade level. No student who qualifies under this subsection shall be removed
from the advanced learning opportunity provided to the student unless a parent or guardian of the
student provides written consent for the student to be excluded or removed after being adequately
informed that the student's placement was determined by the student's achievement on the
previous end-of-grade test.
(b) When advanced courses are offered in mathematics in grades six and higher, any
student scoring at the highest level on the corresponding end-of-grade or end-of-course test for
the mathematics course in which the student was most recently enrolled shall be enrolled in the
advanced course for the next mathematics course in which the student is enrolled. A student in
seventh grade scoring at the highest level on the seventh grade mathematics end-of-grade test
shall be enrolled in a high school level mathematics course in eighth grade. Local boards of
education may provide supplemental content enrichment, which may include the administration
of diagnostic assessments, to students enrolled in a high school level mathematics course. No
student who qualifies under this subsection shall be removed from the advanced or high school
mathematics course in which the student is enrolled unless a parent or guardian of the student
provides written consent for the student to be excluded or removed from that course after being
adequately informed that the student's placement was determined by the student's achievement
on the previous end-of-grade or end-of-course test.
*S507-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b1) When a high school mathematics course is offered in eighth grade, a student in
seventh grade scoring at the highest level on the seventh grade mathematics end-of-grade test
shall be enrolled in a high school level mathematics course in eighth grade. Local boards of
education may provide supplemental content enrichment, which may include the administration
of diagnostic assessments, to students enrolled in a high school level mathematics course.
(c) By December 15, 2020, December 15, 2025, and annually thereafter, the Department
of Public Instruction shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight
Committee containing data collected for the current school year on the number and demographics
number, demographics, and socioeconomic status of students who were eligible for advanced
mathematics courses under this section, including high school level mathematics courses in
eighth grade, and of those students, the number and demographics number, demographics, and
socioeconomic status of those who were placed in advanced mathematics courses and were not
placed in advanced mathematics courses. The report shall include information on the type and
format of advanced mathematics courses provided and shall also include any feedback provided
by local boards of education on the implementation of this section.
(d) The Department of Public Instruction shall provide guidance to local boards of
education on how to best develop programming and courses to ensure all impacted students
receive rigorous, academically appropriate instruction in mathematics.mathematics and English
Language Arts.
(e) No student who qualifies for advanced learning opportunities or advanced courses
under this section shall be removed from the advanced learning opportunity or advanced course
provided to the student unless a parent or guardian of the student provides written consent for the
student to be excluded or removed after being adequately informed that the student's placement
was determined by the student's achievement on the previous end-of-grade or end-of-course test.
Local boards of education may provide supplemental content enrichment, which may include the
administration of diagnostic assessments, to students enrolled in advanced courses."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 507-Second Edition